test/src/morphology/N-tjirje_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - тир: # Noun 'cloud' - full paradigm /Type 12/
     тир+N+Sg+Nom: тир
     тир+N+Sg+Acc: тирамʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen: тирʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat: тиранʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc: тирхана
     тир+N+Sg+Abl: тирхад
     тир+N+Sg+Pros: тирувна
     тир+N+Du+Nom: тирхаʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc: тирхаʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen: тирхаʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Nom: тирˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Acc: [тире, тири]
     тир+N+Pl+Gen: [тиреˮ, тириˮ]
     тир+N+Pl+Dat: тирхаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc: тирхаˮна
     тир+N+Pl+Abl: тирхат
     тир+N+Pl+Pros: тиреˮмана        
     
     тир+N+Sg+Tra: тирӈэ
     тир+N+Pl+Tra: тирˮӈэ

# Possessive forms 

     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: тирв 
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: тир  
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тирда 
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: тирмиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: тириʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: тирдиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: тирваˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: тираˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: тирдоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тирв   
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тирми  
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тирмд  
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: тирмда 
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: тирмиʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: тирмдиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: тирмдиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: тирваˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: тирмдаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: тирмдоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тирн   
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тирони  
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тиронд  
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тиронда 
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: тирониʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: тирондиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: тирондиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: тиронаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: тирондаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: тирондоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тирхан   
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тирхани  
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: тирханд  
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: тирханда 
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: тирханиʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: тирхандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: тирхандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: тирханаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: тирхандаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: тирхандоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тирханан   
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тирханани  
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: тирхананд  
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: тирхананда 
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: тирхананиʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: тирханандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: тирханандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: тирхананаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: тирханандаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: тирханандоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тирхадан   
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тирхадани  
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: тирхаданд  
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: тирхаданда 
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: тирхаданиʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: тирхадандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: тирхадандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: тирхаданаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: тирхадандаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: тирхадандоʼ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: тирхаюн  
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: тирхаюд  
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: тирхаюда 
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: тирхаюниʼ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: тирхаюдиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: тирхаюдиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: тирхаюнаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: тирхаюдаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: тирхаюдоʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: тирхаюн  
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: тирхаюд  
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: тирхаюда 
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: тирхаюниʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: тирхаюдиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: тирхаюдиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: тирхаюнаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: тирхаюдаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: тирхаюдоʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: тирхаюн  
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: тирхают  
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: тирхаюта 
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: тирхаюниʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: тирхаютиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: тирхаютиʼ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: тирхаюнаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: тирхаютаˮ
     тир+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: тирхаютоʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тирен   
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: тиред   
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тиреда  
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тирениʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: тиредиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: тиредиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: тиренаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: тиредаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: тиредоʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тирен   
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: тиред   
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тиреда  
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тирениʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: тиредиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: тиредиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: тиренаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: тиредаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: тиредоʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тиреˮн  
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тирет   
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тирета  
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тиреˮниʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: тиретиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: тиретиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тиреˮнаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: тиретаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: тиретоʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: тирохоˮн 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: тирохот 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: тирохота 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: тирохоˮниʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: тирохотиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: тирохотиʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: тирохоˮнаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: тирохотаˮ 
     тир+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: тирохотоʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: тирохоˮнан  
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: тирохоˮнат  
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: тирохоˮната 
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: тирохоˮнаниʼ 
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: тирохоˮнатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: тирохоˮнатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: тирохоˮнанаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: тирохоˮнатаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: тирохоˮнатоʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: тирохотан 
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: тирохотат 
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: тирохотата 
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: тирохотаниʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: тирохотатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: тирохотатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: тирохотанаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: тирохотатаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: тирохотатоʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тирувнан   
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тирувнани  
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: тирувнанд  
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: тирувнанда 
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: тирувнаниʼ 
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: тирувнандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: тирувнандиʼ
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: тирувнанаˮ 
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: тирувнандаˮ
     тир+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: тирувнандоʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тиреˮманан  
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тиреˮманат  
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тиреˮманата 
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тиреˮмананиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тиреˮманатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тиреˮманатиʼ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тиреˮмананаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тиреˮманатаˮ
     тир+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тиреˮманатоʼ
